Nevada, session 83, SB18.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 353 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, 50 percent of
all remaining balances of appropriations made from the State
General Fund or the State Highway Fund for the operation of a
-
*SB18*

– 2 –
state agency that are not obligated for expenditure on or before
June 30 of that fiscal year:
(a) Must not revert to the State General Fund or State
Highway Fund, as applicable; and
(b) Must be retained by the state agency and used for any
purpose within the responsibilities of the state agency.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a
supplemental or one-time appropriation.
3. As used in this section, “state agency” means an agency,
board, bureau, commission, department, division, office or any
other unit of the Executive Department of the State Government
except those boards listed in NRS 353.005.
Sec. 2. NRS 353.253 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.253 1. Every agency, department and institution of the
State of Nevada shall deposit all money received from the Federal
Government, the counties or other sources, in the State Treasury as
provided in NRS 353.250 unless otherwise provided by law. These
deposits must be made to work program accounts directly or to other
budget accounts.
2. Except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this act and
except for the balance in any proprietary fund and appropriated or
authorized reserves, any balance remaining at the end of a fiscal
year in a budget account of an agency, department or institution of
the State of Nevada, whether or not authorized for expenditure
under a work program, reverts to the source of funding supporting
the agency, department or institution. If that source of funding is
federal money or a source of revenue the use of which is restricted
by statute, then the balance may be authorized for expenditure under
a work program for the subsequent fiscal year in accordance with
the provisions of this chapter.
3. No provision of this chapter may be construed to authorize
or direct the transfer, expenditure or reversion of any money
received from the Federal Government contrary to the conditions
upon which that money was received or to any federal law or
regulation respecting the accountability therefor.
4. This section does not apply to the Board of Regents of the
University of Nevada and the Nevada State Museum.
Sec. 3. NRS 353.255 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.255 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 1
of this act, the sums appropriated for the various branches of
expenditure in the public service of the State shall be applied solely
to the objects for which they are respectively made, and for no
others.
2. Any person violating the provisions of subsection 1 shall be
punished by a fine of not more than $500.
-
*SB18*

– 3 –
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB18*